Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1180.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Tattoo Practice Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active license." A current license issued by the department to a tattoo artist or tattoo establishment under section 3 or 4 that is not expired, suspended or revoked."Active registration." A current registration issued by the department to a guest tattoo artist under section 3 that is not expired, suspended or revoked.1234567891011121314151617181920 "Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Guest tattoo artist." An individual who is licensed, registered or certified to practice tattooing in a jurisdiction outside of this Commonwealth and who is registered with the department under section 3 to practice tattooing in this Commonwealth."Permanent makeup." A technique which employs tattoos as a means of producing designs that resemble makeup, including, but not limited to, eyeliner and other permanent enhancing colors to the skin of the face, lips, eyebrows and eyelids."Tattoo." A mark or design made on or under the skin of a human being by a process of piercing and ingraining a pigment, dye or ink in the skin."Tattoo artist." An individual licensed to practice tattooing under section 3."Tattoo establishment." Any permanent location, place, area, structure or business where tattooing is performed in this Commonwealth."Temporary establishment." Any location, place, area or structure where tattooing is performed in this Commonwealth during a convention or other similar event that does not exceed 14 consecutive days.Section 3. Licensure or registration of tattoo artists or guest tattoo artists.(a) Prohibition.--An individual may not tattoo the body of any human being in this Commonwealth unless the individual is licensed as a tattoo artist or registered as a guest tattoo artist under this section.(b) Licensure.--(1) An individual seeking licensure as a tattoo artist 20250HB1180PN1317 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall apply to the department in a format specified by the department. The application under this subsection shall include all of the following information:(i) The name and residence address of the applicant.(ii) The name and street address of each tattoo establishment and temporary establishment where the applicant intends to practice tattooing in this Commonwealth.(2) The department shall issue a license to an applicant under paragraph (1) who meets all of the following criteria:(i) The applicant is 18 years of age or older.(ii) The applicant submits a completed application.(iii) The applicant pays the license fee imposed under section 7(a)(3).(iv) The applicant submits proof of the successful completion of an education course approved by the department under subsection (c) on blood-borne pathogens and communicable diseases.(v) The applicant submits proof of passage, with a score in excess of 70% sufficiency, of an examination approved by the department under subsection (c) on the material presented in the education course completed under subparagraph (iv).(c) Education courses and examinations.--The department shall approve an education course and examination that allows an applicant to meet the criteria under subsection (b)(2)(iv) and (v) in person or through an Internet website.(d) Change of address.--A tattoo artist shall, within 30 days, notify the department of a change to any of the following information disclosed in the tattoo artist's most recent 20250HB1180PN1317 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application for the issuance or renewal of the tattoo artist's license in a format specified by the department:(1) The name and residence address of the tattoo artist.(2) The name and street address of each tattoo establishment in this Commonwealth where the tattoo artist has practiced tattooing for more than 14 days since the issuance or most recent renewal of the tattoo artist's license.(e) Registration.--(1) An individual seeking registration as a guest tattoo artist shall apply to the department in the format specified by the department. The application under this subsection shall include all of the following information:(i) The name and residence address of the applicant.(ii) The name and street address of each tattoo establishment and temporary establishment where the applicant will practice as a guest tattoo artist.(2) The department shall issue a registration to an applicant under paragraph (1) who meets all of the following criteria:(i) The applicant is 18 years of age or older.(ii) The applicant submits a completed application.(iii) The applicant pays the registration fee imposed under section 7(a)(4).(iv) The applicant holds an active license, a registration or a certification issued by a jurisdiction outside of this Commonwealth, including the District of Columbia, another state or territory of the United States or a foreign nation, and any of the following apply:(A) The education and examination requirements 20250HB1180PN1317 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the license, registration or certification substantially meet or exceed the requirements of the education course and examination approved by the department under subsection (b)(2)(iv) and (v).(B) The applicant meets the criteria specified under subsection (b)(2)(iv) and (v).(f) Renewal and reregistration.--A tattoo artist license shall be valid for one year and must be renewed annually. A guest tattoo artist registration shall be valid for 14 days. A guest tattoo artist may apply for reregistration before or after expiration of the guest tattoo artist's current registration.(g) Transferability.--A tattoo artist license or guest tattoo artist registration issued by the department under this section shall not be transferable.Section 4. Licensure of tattoo establishments and temporary establishments.(a) Tattooing prohibited.--An individual may not tattoo the body of a human being in this Commonwealth unless the individual is located at a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment licensed under this section.(b) Licensure.--(1) An individual seeking licensure of a tattoo establishment must apply to the department in a format prescribed by the department. The application under this subsection shall include all of the following information:(i) The registered business name, including any fictitious name under which the tattoo establishment conducts business in this Commonwealth.(ii) The street address and telephone number of the tattoo establishment.20250HB1180PN1317 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The name, mailing address and telephone number of the tattoo establishment's operator.(iv) The name and address of the tattoo establishment's registered office.(2) The department shall issue a tattoo establishment license to an applicant under paragraph (1) if all of the following criteria are met:(i) The applicant submits a completed application.(ii) The applicant pays the license fee specified under section 7(a)(1).(iii) The establishment complies with all applicable local building, occupational, zoning and health codes.(c) Unlicensed businesses.--A tattoo establishment may be located in a single room in a business not licensed under this section if the room meets the practice requirements under section 5 and the room is being used exclusively for permanent makeup.(d) Temporary establishments.--A temporary establishment shall meet the same requirements for licensure as a tattoo establishment.(e) Change of address.--A license shall be valid only for the location listed on the license. A tattoo establishment must notify the department, in a format specified by the department, before changing a licensed location. A tattoo establishment with more than one location shall obtain a separate license for each location.(f) Validity and renewals.--A tattoo establishment license shall be valid for one year and must be renewed annually. A temporary establishment license shall be valid for the duration of a convention or other similar event for which the license is 20250HB1180PN1317 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issued not to exceed 14 consecutive days.(g) Transferability.--A license issued by the department under this section shall not be transferable.Section 5. Practice requirements of tattoo establishments and temporary establishments.A tattoo establishment or temporary establishment shall do all of the following:(1) Display an active license for the establishment in a manner that is easily visible to the public at all times while tattooing is performed at the establishment.(2) Ensure that each tattoo artist and guest tattoo artist, while practicing tattooing at the establishment, meets all applicable requirements established by the department.(3) Maintain sanitary conditions at the establishment at all times.(4) Comply with all State and local health laws, regulations, ordinances and codes.(5) Allow the department to inspect the establishment in accordance with section 8.Section 6. Practice requirements of tattoo artists and guest tattoo artists.A tattoo artist or guest tattoo artist shall do all of the following:(1) Display the artist's active license or active registration in a manner that is easily visible to the public at all times while practicing tattooing.(2) Practice tattooing exclusively at a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment licensed under section 4.20250HB1180PN1317 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Maintain sanitary conditions at a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment at all times.(4) Comply with all State and local health laws, regulations, ordinances and codes.Section 7. Imposition of fees.(a) Imposition.--Except as provided under subsection (b), the department shall impose the following fees:(1) For initial licensure of a tattoo establishment and the renewal of the license, a fee not to exceed $250 per year.(2) For the licensure of a temporary establishment, a fee not to exceed $250.(3) For the initial licensure of a tattoo artist and the renewal of the license, a fee not to exceed $150 per year.(4) For registration or reregistration of a guest tattoo artist, a fee not to exceed $45.(5) For reactivation of an inactive tattoo establishment license, a fee not to exceed $250 per year.(6) For reactivation of an inactive tattoo artist license, a fee not to exceed $150 per year.(b) Adjustment.--The department may annually adjust the fees imposed under subsection (a) in accordance with the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.Section 8. Inspections by department.(a) Authorization.--The department may inspect and investigate each tattoo establishment or temporary establishment 20250HB1180PN1317 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as necessary to ensure compliance with this act.(b) Initial inspections.--The department shall inspect a tattoo establishment at least once before the tattoo establishment performs tattoo services.(c) Annual inspections.--The department shall annually inspect 20% of all tattoo establishments in this Commonwealth on a randomized basis.(d) Temporary establishments.--The department shall inspect a temporary establishment before and, as necessary, during a convention or similar event where tattooing is performed at the temporary establishment.Section 9. Administrative penalties.(a) Disciplinary actions.--The following acts by any tattoo establishment, temporary establishment, tattoo artist, guest tattoo artist, operator or unlicensed person may be subject to an administrative penalty under subsection (b):(1) Providing false information on an application for licensure or registration under section 3 or 4.(2) Violating any State or local health law, regulation, ordinance or code.(3) Violating any provision of this act, regulation promulgated under this act or order issued by the department under this act.(4) Being found guilty of or pleading nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in any jurisdiction which relates to the practice of tattooing or the operation of a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment.(5) Committing fraud, deceit, negligence or misconduct in the practice of tattooing or the operation of a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment.20250HB1180PN1317 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Aiding, procuring or assisting a person to unlawfully practice tattooing or to unlawfully operate a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment.(b) Penalties.--(1) If the department determines that a person committed an act specified under subsection (a), the department may enter an order imposing any of the following administrative penalties:(i) A refusal to issue a license or registration or renew a license under section 3 or 4.(ii) A suspension or revocation of a license or registration under section 3 or 4.(iii) An administrative fine not to exceed $1,500 for each count or separate act specified under subsection (a).(iv) A reprimand.(v) Probation for a specified period and subject to the conditions imposed by the department.(vi) A corrective action.(2) The department shall impose stricter penalties than the penalties imposed under paragraph (1) on a person who commits repetitive acts under subsection (a) or commits an act under subsection (a) that endangers public health.Section 10. Criminal penalties.A person commits a misdemeanor of the second degree if the person engages in any of the following acts:(1) Operating a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment in this Commonwealth without a license under section 4.(2) Practicing tattooing in this Commonwealth without a 20250HB1180PN1317 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license or registration under section 3.(3) Practicing tattooing in this Commonwealth at any place other than a tattoo establishment or temporary establishment.(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or registration under section 3 or 4 by means of fraud, misrepresentation or concealment.Section 11. Preemption of local ordinances or rules.Nothing in this act shall preempt a local ordinance or rule that imposes additional requirements on tattoo establishments, temporary establishments, tattoo artists, guest tattoo artists or the practice of tattooing than specified under this act.Section 12. Applicability.(a) Medical or dental purposes.--This act shall not apply to tattooing performed for medical purposes by a physician licensed under the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, or the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, or tattooing performed for dental purposes by a dentist licensed under the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.216, No.76), known as The Dental Law.(b) Animals.--This act shall apply exclusively to the tattooing of human beings. This act shall not apply to the tattooing of animals.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1180PN1317 - 11 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526